Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
CHAPTER 395 Personal Representatives

395.001.
Definition of “fiduciary.”

The term “fiduciary” as used in this chapter:

Means any person, association, or corporation meeting the requirements of KRS

395.005

(other than assignee or trustee for an insolvent debtor or a guardian under the Uniform Veterans’ Guardianship Act) appointed by, or under the control of, or accountable to, the District Court, including executors, administrators, administrators with the will annexed, curators, guardians and conservators; and

Does not include testamentary trustees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 1; 1944, ch. 115, § 4; 1972, ch. 203, § 53; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 381, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 105, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 277, § 8, effective July 15, 1982; 2014, ch. 25, § 111, effective July 15, 2014.

395.005.
Who may be appointed as fiduciary.

The following persons may be appointed as fiduciary:

Any resident of the state of Kentucky, over eighteen (18) years of age, except as set out in KRS

395.080

, and any national bank located in Kentucky having fiduciary powers and any state bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the state of Kentucky and authorized by law to act as fiduciary;

To the extent permitted pursuant to KRS

286.3-146

and

286.3-920

(6), any bank or trust company organized under the laws of a state other than Kentucky; and

Any nonresident of legal age who is as to the decedent, ward, or incompetent, related by consanguinity, marriage, adoption or the spouse of such person so related.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 2; 1968, ch. 100, § 10; 1970, ch. 29, § 1; 1980, ch. 259, § 19, effective July 15, 1980; 2011, ch. 67, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.

395.010.
Administration must be within ten years after death.

Original administration shall not be granted after the expiration of ten (10) years from the death of the testator or intestate and if made after that time, it shall be void.

History.

3895: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 259, § 20, effective July 15, 1980.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The provision of this section requiring a physical disclosure of security or securities shown in the account refers to all fiduciaries as specifically defined by this section except corporate fiduciaries under supervision of state or federal banking authorities.

OAG 78-298

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

District Court, probate jurisdiction, KRS

24A.120

.

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Ratliff, Kentucky Probate — A Simple Overview, Volume 54, No. 1, Winter 1990 Ky. Bench & B. 16.

395.012.
Right to file demand for notice of action regarding estate.

Any person having a financial or property interest in a decedent’s estate may file a demand for notice with the court at any time after the death of the decedent, stating the name of the decedent, the nature of the demandant’s interest in the estate, and his address or that of his attorney.

If a personal representative has been appointed at the time of filing of the demand, the court shall advise the demandant of the appointment and transmit a copy of each order entered, regarding the estate to the demandant.

After the filing of a demand, no order or filing to which the demand relates shall be entered until the person seeking such order certifies as provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure that the demandant or his attorney has been given written notice. The requirement for notice arising from a demand under this provision may be waived in writing by the demandant and in any event shall cease upon the termination of his interest in the estate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 19.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Demand for Notice of Orders and Filings, Forms 230.06, 233.12.

395.015.
Applications for appointment of personal representative.

Before being appointed as executor, administrator, curator, or administrator with the will annexed, every person shall make and file in duplicate a written application under oath, which must state the names of the deceased’s surviving spouse and all of his heirs-at-law or such as are known, their post office address if known, the date of death and also a statement in general terms as to what the estate consists of and the probable value of the personal and real estate and also a statement of any indebtedness owing by the applicant to the deceased. The foregoing requirement in respect to names and addresses of heirs-at-law may be omitted when the application is being made by the executor named in the will unless requested by the court. The application of a nonresident shall include the designation of a resident of the county where administration is pending as his agent for the service of process in any action against him as personal representative or personally, provided that such personal action must have accrued in the administration of the estate. A duplicate copy of said application shall be mailed by the clerk to the secretary of revenue of the State of Kentucky.

In the case of intestacy, or where an administrator with will annexed or de bonis non is to be appointed, if there be no surviving spouse, or if such spouse waives the right of appointment or is not qualified to act and does not nominate a suitable administrator and there is more than one (1) resident heir-at-law entitled to appointment, the court shall thereupon set a time for hearing such application. Notice of said hearing shall be given to the surviving spouse and all known heirs of the deceased residing in the state, or elsewhere, in the manner provided in KRS

395.016

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 5; 1968, ch. 200, § 7; 1970, ch. 29, § 2; 1972, ch. 168, § 15; 1974, ch. 299, § 13; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 382, effective January 2, 1978.

395.016.
Notice of hearing of application.

When notice of hearing of an application for the appointment of an administrator, administrator with will annexed or guardian is required, it shall be given by mailing written notice of the time, place and purpose of such hearing at least five (5) days before said hearing. Proof of such notice shall be by certified mail, return receipt requested or by applicant’s affidavit that the same was mailed to each of the parties entitled thereto in a sealed envelope, postage prepaid, and the date when posted, which proof shall be filed at the time of hearing. If all parties entitled to notice are under no disability and waive notice in writing, the court may hear such application as if notice had been given. A minor over fourteen (14) years of age may waive notice if present in person at the time of hearing of application for appointment of his guardian; provided, however in any estate where the gross amount involved is less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) the court in its discretion may dispense with the requirements of this section relating to notice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 7; 1974, ch. 315, § 84; 1982, ch. 141, § 106, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 277, § 9, effective July 15, 1982.

395.020.
Executor not to act until will probated — Exception.

The person named in a will as executor shall not act as executor to any extent until the will or an authenticated copy of the will is admitted to record, and he has executed bond and taken oath in the court in which the record is made. He may, however, provide for the burial of the testator, pay the reasonable funeral expenses, and take care of and preserve the estate.

History.

3886.

395.030.
Jurisdiction of administration of intestate’s estate.

When a person dies intestate, the District Court which would have had jurisdiction to probate his will, had he made a will, shall have jurisdiction to grant administration on his estate.

History.

3894: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 383, effective January 2, 1978.

395.040.
Administrator — Persons entitled to be appointed — Discovery of will.

The court shall grant administration to the relations of the deceased who apply for administration, preferring the surviving husband or wife, or if the surviving husband or wife does not nominate a suitable administrator, then such others as are next entitled to distribution, or one (1) or more of them whom the court judges will best manage the estate.

If no person mentioned in subsection (1) applies for administration within sixty (60) days from the death of an intestate, the court may grant administration to a creditor, or to any other person, in its discretion.

No master or other commissioner whose duty it is to settle the accounts of a personal representative shall be appointed an administrator.

If a will is afterwards produced and proved, the administration shall cease, and the court may grant a certificate of the probate of the will, or, in the proper case, letters of administration with the will annexed.

History.

3867, 3896, 3897: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 299, § 14; 1982, ch. 277, § 11, effective July 15, 1982.

395.050.
Administrator with will annexed — Appointment — Functions.

If no executor is appointed by the will, or if all the executors named in the will die, refuse the executorship or fail to give bond the court may grant administration with the will annexed to the person who would have been entitled to administration if there had been no will, but no person shall be eligible to appointment as administrator with the will annexed whose interests are antagonistic to the provisions of the will. Failure to give bond shall amount to refusal to act as executor.

An administrator with the will annexed shall possess and exercise all power and authority, have the same rights and interest and be responsible in like manner as the executors named in it.

History.

3891, 3892.

395.060.
Continuation of administration when powers of representatives cease.

When the powers of one (1) personal representative cease, the remaining personal representatives may carry the trust into execution. If there is no remaining personal representative, an administrator de bonis non, or, if there is a will, an administrator with the will annexed, shall be appointed.

History.

3845.

395.070.
Executor of executor cannot administer estate of first testator.

The executor of an executor shall have no authority, as such, to administer the estate of the first testator, but on the death of the sole or surviving executor of any last will, administration with the will annexed of the estate of the first testator may be granted, if the estate has not already been administered, to such person as would have been entitled to administration if the testator had died intestate.

History.

3890.

395.080.
When minor may be executor.

If all the persons nominated as executors are under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of probating the will, or those who are of age fail to qualify, administration with the will annexed may be granted during such minority. But if a testator, by his will, so directs, then such infant executor may qualify and give bond as an adult.

History.

3893: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 100, § 11.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context Parent and Child, § 256.00.

395.090.
Married woman may be representative or other fiduciary. [Repealed.]

395.100.
Appointment of debtor does not extinguish debt.

The appointment of a debtor executor does not extinguish the debt unless the will so directs.

History.

3889.

395.105.
Fiduciary must have letters of appointment — General duties — When appointment effective.

Every fiduciary, before entering upon the execution of the trust, shall receive letters of appointment from the District Court having jurisdiction as now fixed by law. The duties of a fiduciary shall be such as are required by law, and such additional duties not inconsistent therewith as the court may order. The appointment shall be effective with the signing of an order by the judge.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 3; 1970, ch. 257, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 384, effective January 2, 1978.

395.110.
Copy of order effectual as probate or letters.

A copy of the order by which a certificate is granted to any personal representative obtaining probate or letters of administration shall be as effectual as the probate or letters made out in due form. The clerk of the court making such an order shall, when required by any personal representative, make out such letters and probate in due form, and certify them, under the seal of his court.

History.

3842.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Order to be replaced in record when original lost, KRS

422.230

.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Executors and Administrators, § 234.00.

395.120.
Oaths of representatives.

Each executor, administrator and curator shall take an oath to faithfully perform the duties of his office to the best of his judgment.

Each administrator shall also take an oath that his intestate, so far as he knows or believes, died without leaving a will.

History.

3841.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Text of oath to be taken by personal representative, KRS

62.030

.

395.130.
Bond, when required — Cost of corporate surety paid from estate.

Every fiduciary, except as provided in KRS

286.3-220

and

386B.7-020

, shall provide surety on his bond unless, on the petition of any interested party, the court upon being satisfied that all interests are adequately protected excuses the requirement of a surety, or unless, by the terms of the will or trust, surety is not required. Subsequent to the qualification of a fiduciary and on motion of any interested party the court may reduce the amount of the bond, release the surety, or permit the substitution of another bond with the same or different sureties. If an executor does not give bond when required to do so, he shall not be permitted to qualify, and, if he has already qualified, he shall be removed.

Whenever any personal representative, guardian, conservator, or fiduciary who is required by law to execute a bond for the faithful discharge of his duties or fulfillment of his trust, procures as surety on his bond an incorporated surety company authorized to do business in this state, the necessary and reasonable cost incident to the bond shall be a lawful charge against the estate in the hands of the fiduciary, as other expenses of administration, and in his settlement the fiduciary shall be entitled to credit by the amount actually paid by him for that purpose, subject to the approval of the court which has approved the bond.

History.

3837, 3837a, 3887: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 257, § 3; 1982, ch. 141, § 107, effective July 1, 1982; 2014, ch. 25, § 112, effective July 15, 2014.

395.140.
Bond — Persons not to be surety on — Recording of.

The District Court shall not accept as surety, in any bond of a personal representative, any master or other commissioner whose duty is to settle the accounts of personal representatives or any judge or clerk of a District Court or practicing attorney of that court.

The bond shall be subscribed by the principal and sureties, approved by the court, attested by the clerk of the court and carefully kept by the clerk in his office in a book to be provided for that purpose.

History.

3838, 3867: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 385, effective January 2, 1978.

395.145.
Attorney for fiduciary.

At the time of appointment of a fiduciary, he may designate an attorney who will represent him in matters relating to the trust, and when so designated notices to such fiduciary shall also be sent by the court to such attorney.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 4; 1966, ch. 255, § 268.

395.150.
Compensation of representatives.

The compensation of an executor, administrator or curator, for services as such, shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the value of the personal estate of the decedent, plus five percent (5%) of the income collected by the executor, administrator or curator for the estate.

Upon proof submitted showing that an executor, administrator or curator has performed additional services in the administration of the decedent’s estate, the court may allow to the executor, administrator or curator such additional compensation as would be fair and reasonable for the additional services rendered, if the additional services were:

Unusual or extraordinary and not normally incident to the administration of a decedent’s estate; or

Performed in connection with real estate or with estate and inheritance taxes claimed against property that is not a part of the decedent’s estate but is included in the decedent’s estate for the purpose of asserting such taxes.

History.

3883.

395.155.
Computation of personal representative’s commission.

For the purpose of computing commissions whenever any portion of the dividends, interests, rents or other amounts payable to an executor, administrator, trustee, guardian, conservator, curator or other personal representative or fiduciary is required by any law of the United States or other governmental unit to be withheld for income tax purposes by the person, corporation, organization or governmental unit paying the same, the amount so withheld shall be deemed to have been collected.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 149; 1982, ch. 141, § 108, effective July 1, 1982.

395.160.
Removal of representatives.

If a personal representative moves out of the state and fails to designate a process agent as required by KRS 395.015(1), becomes insane or otherwise incapable to discharge the trust, goes bankrupt or insolvent or is in failing circumstances, the District Court shall remove him, and the other personal representative, if there is another, shall discharge the trust. If he resides in the county of his appointment or in an adjoining county, and is not insane, he shall have ten (10) days’ notice before the order of removal is made. If he is insane, the notice shall be given to his committee, if he has one, and if there is no committee, the court may appoint one.

The district court may remove a personal representative for failing to give additional security when required under KRS

62.060

and appoint another.

The court shall require a personal representative who is removed to settle his accounts, and deliver over the decedent’s estate to the person appointed in his stead.

History.

3839, 3840, 3846: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 299, § 15; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 386, effective January 2, 1978.

395.170.
Nonresident representatives — Bond — Actions by.

By giving bond, with surety that is resident of the county in which the action is brought, nonresident executors or administrators of persons who were nonresidents at the time of their death may prosecute actions for the recovery of debts due to such decedents.

In such actions the plaintiff’s letters testamentary or letters of administration, granted by a competent tribunal, properly authenticated, shall be filed. No judgment shall be rendered until the plaintiff executes bond to the state, with good surety that is resident of the county, conditioned to pay any debt due by his decedent to any resident of this state to the extent assets come to his hands.

Actions may be brought on the bond required by subsection (2) for the use of any creditor of the decedent for three (3) years after the date of each receipt of assets by the executor or administrator in this state but not after.

If there is an executor or administrator of such a decedent qualified by a court of this state, he alone may sue, but any debtor who pays his debt or part of it to a nonresident personal representative without notice of the resident personal representative shall be discharged to the extent of such payment.

History.

3878 to 3880.

395.180.
Appraisers. [Repealed.]

395.190.
Time for distribution of estate.

A personal representative may distribute the estate of a decedent six (6) months after qualification.

History.

3860: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 17.

395.195.
Transactions authorized for personal representative — Exceptions.

Except as restricted or otherwise provided by the will, or by KRS

395.200

, a personal representative, acting reasonably for the benefit of the interested persons, may properly:

Retain assets owned by the decedent pending distribution or liquidation including those in which the representative is personally interested or which are otherwise improper for trust investment;

Receive assets from fiduciaries, or other sources;

Perform, compromise or refuse performance for proper cause of the decedent’s contracts that continue as obligations of the estate, as he may determine under the circumstances;

Satisfy written charitable pledges of the decedent irrespective of whether the pledges constituted binding obligations of the decedent or were properly presented as claims, if in the judgment of the personal representative the decedent would have wanted the pledges completed under the circumstances;

If funds are not needed to meet debts and expenses currently payable and are not immediately distributable, deposit or invest liquid assets of the estate, including moneys received from the sale of other assets, in federally insured interest-bearing accounts, readily marketable secured loan arrangements or other prudent investments which would be reasonable for use by trustees generally;

Acquire or dispose of an asset, other than land, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale; and manage, exchange, or change the character of an estate asset;

Enter for any purpose into a lease for personal property as lessor or lessee, with or without option to purchase or renew, for a term within or extending beyond the period of administration;

Abandon personal property when, in the opinion of the personal representative, it is valueless, or is so encumbered, or is in such condition that it is of no benefit to the estate;

Vote stocks or other securities in person or by general or limited proxy;

Pay calls, assessments, and other sums chargeable or accruing against or on account of securities, unless barred by the provisions relating to claims;

Hold a security in the name of a nominee or in other form without disclosure of the interest of the estate but the personal representative is liable for any act of the nominee in connection with the security so held;

Insure the assets of the estate against damage, loss and liability and himself against liability as to third persons;

Borrow money with or without security to be repaid from the probatable assets or otherwise; and advance money for the protection of the estate;

Effect a fair and reasonable compromise with any debtor or obligor, or extend, renew or in any manner modify the terms of any obligation owing to the estate. If the personal representative holds a mortgage, pledge or other lien upon property of another person, he may, in lieu of foreclosure, accept a conveyance or transfer of encumbered assets from the owner thereof in satisfaction of the indebtedness secured by lien;

Pay taxes, assessments, compensation of the personal representative, and other expenses incident to the administration of the estate;

Sell or exercise stock subscription or conversion rights; consent, directly or through a committee or other agent, to the reorganization, consolidation, merger, dissolution, or liquidation of a corporation or other business enterprise;

Allocate items of income or expense to either estate income or principal, as permitted or provided by law;

Employ persons, including attorneys, auditors, investment advisors, or agents, to advise or assist the personal representative in the performance of his administrative duties; act without independent investigation upon their recommendations; and instead of acting personally, employ one (1) or more agents to perform any act of administration, whether or not discretionary;

Prosecute or defend claims, or proceedings in any jurisdiction for the protection of the estate and of the personal representative in the performance of his duties;

Sell or mortgage any personal property or any interest therein for cash, credit, or for part cash and part credit, and with or without security for unpaid balances;

Provide for exoneration of the personal representative from personal liability in any contract entered into on behalf of the estate;

Satisfy, settle or compromise claims and distribute the estate as provided by law; and

Take such actions as are necessary to cause gains from the sale or exchange of estate assets as determined for federal income tax purposes, to be taxed for federal income tax purposes as a part of a distribution of income, including the power to allocate such gains to income for the purpose of making discretionary distributions and to allocate such gains to income which has been increased by an adjustment from principal to income pursuant to KRS 386.454(1), to a unitrust distribution, or to a distribution of principal to a beneficiary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 24; 1980, ch. 259, § 21, effective July 15, 1980; 2012, ch. 59, § 6, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 25, § 113, effective July 15, 2014.

395.196.
Powers in KRS 395.195 not exclusive.

The powers set forth in KRS

395.195

are not intended to be exclusive but rather in addition to any powers which the personal representative has at the time of enactment of the provisions of KRS

395.195

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 25.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Resolution of this issue turns on the proper interpretation of the phrase “applicable law” appearing in
45 CFR 164.502(g)(4).
KRS

209.140

does not vest an executor, administrator, or any other person with authority to act on behalf of a deceased individual or the individual’s estate, but is instead a confidentiality provision the terms of which are engrafted upon the Open Records law by operation of KRS 61.878(1)(
l
). It is KRS Chapter 395 that grants authority to act on behalf of a deceased individual or of the individual’s estate, and that law, operating in tandem with
45 CFR 164.502(g)(4), requires the Cabinet to accord the requester, as her mother’s personal representative, the same treatment it would have accorded her mother. As the mother would have been entitled to a copy of the report per
KRS

209.140

(5), so the requester is entitled to a copy. To the extent that OAG 2003-ORD-194 is inconsistent with this view, it is hereby overruled. OAG 2006-ORD-048.

395.197.
Applicability of powers in KRS 395.195 and 395.196.

The powers set forth in KRS

395.195

and

395.196

shall not be effective as to wills executed or personal representatives appointed and qualifying prior to June 19, 1976.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 53; 1980, ch. 259, § 22, effective July 15, 1980.

395.200.
Sale of personal property by fiduciary.

At any time after the appointment of a fiduciary, the fiduciary, when satisfied that it would be for the best interests of the estate, may sell, at public or private sale, at the best price obtainable, and for cash or on such terms as the fiduciary may determine, any part or all of the personal property belonging to the estate, including dividend-paying and interest-bearing securities, except:

Such tangible personal property as has been set apart to the surviving spouse as exempt.

Property specifically bequeathed, when sale of such property is not necessary for the payment of debts, provided that such property may be sold with the consent of the person entitled thereto.

Property as to which distribution in kind has been demanded prior to the sale by the surviving spouse or other beneficiary entitled to such distribution in kind, or property which the court may determine to be suitable for distribution in kind.

Property, the sale of which is contrary to the wish of the testator, as shown by his will, unless the court finds that the sale is necessary to pay debts, funeral and burial expenses, taxes, and costs of administration, or that the retention of it will probably cause great loss to the estate.

History.

3854: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 115, § 2; 1976, ch. 218, § 21; 1982, ch. 277, § 12, effective July 15, 1982.

395.210.
Perishable goods to be sold; distribution of proceeds. [Repealed.]

395.220.
Sale of land when authorized by will.

The executors, or such of them as undertake the execution of the will, or, if all or more than one (1) undertake the execution of the will and part die or vacate the office, the residue or survivor, may sell and convey the land which the will directs or devises to the executor or to another person to be sold, or gives a discretionary power to sell, if no other person is appointed for that purpose, or if the person appointed refuses to perform the trust or dies before he has completed it.

Pending an action or procedure to set aside or reject the will, there shall be no power to sell the land of the deceased, except under a judgment of court.

History.

3848, 3888.

395.230.
Stock transfer may be ordered by county clerk. [Repealed.]

395.240.
Sale of choses in action — Compromise of claims.

In actions for the settlement of decedents’ estates, the court may direct the sale of choses in action, including judgments, and may authorize the personal representative to compromise claims growing out of contract or tort due the estate, as well as claims on contract or tort against the estate. A personal representative may compromise and settle any claim or demand for damages growing out of injury to or the death of the decedent.

History.

3882.

395.250.
Inventory — When to be returned — Copies are evidence.

It shall be the duty of a personal representative of a decedent to return an inventory in duplicate within two (2) months from the time of qualifying as such, to the clerk’s office of the court in which he qualified, the original of which shall be recorded by the clerk and the duplicate shall be mailed by the clerk to the secretary of revenue. Copies from the record of the inventory or appraisement shall be prima facie evidence for or against such representative.

History.

3855: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 11.

395.255.
Notice to compel filing of inventory or account — Removal for delinquency — Disallowance of compensation.

If a fiduciary neglects or refuses to file an inventory or account when due according to law, or when ordered by the court, the court shall notify the fiduciary of his delinquency and fix a date when such inventory or account must be filed. Unless there is pending in the circuit court a suit to settle the estate such neglect or refusal shall be grounds for removal by the court. If the fiduciary fails to file such account within thirty (30) days after the date fixed in said notice, no allowance shall be made for his services unless the court enters upon its minutes an order that such delay was justified.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 12.

395.260.
Personal estate of nonresident — Administration of.

When administration is taken in this state on the estate of a nonresident decedent, the residue of his personal estate, after payment of his debts to citizens of this state, may either be distributed and disposed of according to the law of the decedent’s domicile, and if he has a will it shall be governed by the law of his domicile, or, if the court thinks best and so orders, such residue may be transmitted to the personal representatives, if there are any, in the state of the decedent’s domicile, to be disposed of there according to the law of that state.

History.

3898, 3899.

395.270.
When action against representative may be commenced.

Two (2) months must run after the date of the qualification of the first personal representative of a decedent’s estate before an action shall be commenced against any executor or administrator thereof, except against an executor de son tort. Any action brought in violation of this section shall be dismissed with costs, except that an alleged creditor whose claim has been denied in writing by the fiduciary may commence action immediately after receipt of such denial.

History.

3847: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 167, § 15; 1970, ch. 257, § 2; 1988, ch. 90, § 5, effective July 15, 1988.

395.275.
When plaintiff may revive action against defendant’s representative. [Repealed.]

395.276.
Limitation on time for revivor. [Repealed.]

395.277.
When representative or successor may revive action — Limitation. [Repealed.]

395.278.
When party may revive action and limitation.

An application to revive an action in the name of the representative or successor of a plaintiff, or against the representative or successor of a defendant, shall be made within one (1) year after the death of a deceased party.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 299, § 16.

395.280.
Successor of representative may be substituted in actions.

When any personal representative commences an action or is sued, and then dies, is removed or is superseded by another before the termination of the action, his successor may, by order of court, be substituted for the original plaintiff or defendant.

History.

3844.

395.290.
Extent of liability of representative.

No failure to plead or make defense and no plea or answer made by a personal representative shall render him liable for more than the amount of assets that come to his hands to be administered, but the judgment of the court shall render him liable only for the amount of assets in his hands unadministered.

History.

3866.

395.300.
Successor may sue former representative.

An administrator de bonis non or any other successor appointed in the place of a personal representative who has resigned or has been removed or whose letters have been revoked, or who has ceased to act or has died, may maintain an action against the former personal representative and the sureties on the administration bond and against the predecessor’s real and personal representatives, for all damages or debts arising from the maladministration or omission of the predecessor.

History.

3846-1.

395.310.
Interest charged representative on assets.

A personal representative, after the expiration of two (2) years from the time he qualifies, shall be charged with interest on the surplus assets in his hands from that period, and before the expiration of two (2) years shall be charged with all interest realized on assets.

History.

3859.

395.320.
Resignation of representative. [Repealed.]

395.325.
Fiduciary resignation or disability — Settlement of accounts.

If any fiduciary resigns or is removed, he shall upon the appointment of his successor settle his accounts.

If any fiduciary becomes mentally disabled or dies, the personal representative of his estate shall upon the appointment of a successor fiduciary for the mentally disabled fiduciary or decedent settle for his decedent the accounts of the first decedent.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 257, § 4; 1982, ch. 141, § 109, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 277, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 2014, ch. 25, § 114, effective July 15, 2014.

395.326.
Nomination of successor trustee by testamentary trustee. [Repealed.]

395.330.
Acts prior to revocation of powers valid.

Where an order of administration is set aside or letters of administration revoked, or where any executor or administrator is removed, or the will under which he acted is declared invalid, all previous sales of personal estate made lawfully by the executor or administrator and with good faith on the part of the purchaser and all other lawful acts done by the executor or administrator, shall remain valid and effectual.

History.

3848.

395.340.
Estate for life of another considered personal estate.

Estates held by a deceased person for life of another shall go to the personal representative of the deceased as assets in his hands, and, shall be applied and distributed as the personal estate.

History.

3861.

395.350.
Emblements — When personalty and when real estate.

All the emblements of the lands of a person dying after March 1 which are severed before the following December 31 shall be assets in the hands of his personal representative.

All the emblements growing on the lands of the deceased on December 31 or at his death, if that happens after December 31 and before March 1, shall pass with the land to the heir, devisee, reversioner or remainderman.

History.

3862, 3863.

395.360.
Apportionment of rents.

When a person who has a freehold or an uncertain interest in land rents out the land and dies before the rent becomes due, the rent of the land shall be apportioned between the personal representatives of the deceased and the person who succeeds to the land as heir, personal representative, devisee or person in reversion or remainder, unless, in the case of a devisee, the will otherwise directs.

History.

3865.

395.370.
Tombstone allowed as funeral expense.

The personal representative or heirs may cause to be erected over the grave of the deceased an appropriate memorial tablet, the cost of which shall be allowed as funeral expenses on the settlement of the estate.

History.

3885.

395.380.
Public administrator and guardian.

The District Court of each county shall appoint a discreet, fit person to act as administrator of decedents’ estates of which there is no personal representative, and as guardian of orphans who have no guardian.

He shall serve at the discretion of the District Court.

He shall be sworn and execute bond with good surety to the state for the faithful discharge of his duties, and when so sworn with bond so executed, shall be accepted by the court in every estate in which the public administrator is appointed without the necessity of additional surety.

History.

3903, 3904: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 151, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 387, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 277, § 15, effective July 15, 1982.

395.390.
Public administrator and guardian to act, when.

The District Court of a county which has a public administrator and guardian shall, after the expiration of sixty (60) days from the death of the decedent, order the public administrator and guardian to administer the estate of the decedent where the surviving spouse and heirs waive their right to be appointed, or if the surviving spouse does not nominate a suitable administrator, or in the event any of the persons designated in KRS

395.040

are unable, or found to be incapable of handling or managing the estate, or if from any other cause there is no personal representative. If there is no public administrator and guardian, the court shall order the sheriff to administer the estate.

The District Court shall also confide to the public administrator and guardian the care and control of the persons and estates of all minors when it appears that a minor has no testamentary guardian and no one will apply for appointment, or serve, as guardian.

History.

3905, 3907: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 151, § 2; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 388, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 277, § 16, effective July 15, 1982.